Utah statutes.
79-4-802.   Riverway enhancement grants -- Matching funds requirements -- Rules.

(1) (a)  The division may give grants to local governments and state agencies for riverway enhancement projects with funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.

(b)  Each grant recipient must provide matching funds having a value that is equal to or greater than the grant funds received. 

(c)  The board may allow a grant recipient to provide property, material, or labor in lieu of money, provided the grant recipient's contribution has a value that is equal to or greater than the grant funds received.

(2)  The board shall:

(a)  make rules setting forth procedures and criteria for the awarding of grants for riverway enhancement projects; and

(b)  determine to whom grant funds shall be awarded after considering the recommendations of and after consulting with the division.

(3)  Rules for the awarding of grants for riverway enhancement projects shall provide that:

(a)  each riverway enhancement project for which grant funds are awarded must be along a river or stream that is impacted by high density populations or prone to flooding; and

(b)  riverway enhancement proposals that include a plan to provide employment opportunities for youth, including at-risk youth as defined in Section 79-5-501, in the development of the riverway enhancement project is encouraged.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

